Utah statutes.
20A-2-204.   Registering to vote when applying for or renewing a driver license.

(1)  As used in this section, "voter registration form" means the driver license application/voter registration form and the driver license renewal/voter registration form required by Section 20A-2-108.

(2)  Any citizen who is qualified to vote may register to vote by completing the voter registration form.

(3)  The Driver License Division shall:

(a)  assist applicants in completing the voter registration form unless the applicant refuses assistance;

(b)  accept completed forms for transmittal to the appropriate election official;

(c)  transmit a copy of each voter registration form to the appropriate election official within five days after it is received by the division;

(d)  transmit each address change within five days after it is received by the division; and

(e)  transmit electronically to the lieutenant governor’s office the name, address, birth date, and driver license number of each person who answers "yes" to the question on the driver license form about registering to vote.

(4)  Upon receipt of a correctly completed voter registration form, the county clerk shall:

(a)  enter the applicant's name on the list of registered voters for the voting precinct in which the applicant resides; and

(b)  notify the applicant of registration.

(5) (a)  If the county clerk receives a correctly completed voter registration form that is dated after the voter registration deadline, the county clerk shall:

(i)  register the applicant after the next election; and

(ii)  if possible, promptly phone or mail a notice to the applicant before the election, informing the applicant that his registration will not be effective until after the election.

(b)  When the county clerk receives a correctly completed voter registration form at least seven days before an election that is dated on or before the voter registration deadline, the county clerk shall:

(i)  process the voter registration form; and

(ii)  record the new voter in the official register.

(6)  If the county clerk determines that a voter registration form received from the Driver License Division is incorrect because of an error or because it is incomplete, the county clerk shall mail notice to the person attempting to register, informing him that he has not been registered because of an error or because the form is incomplete.

